Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.130

Powers and duties of regents—General.

General powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:

(1) To have full control of the university and its property of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.

(2) To employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the faculty, and employees of the institution, who except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW 28B.77.020. Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant at the university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.

(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the course of study in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(6) Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended for such students by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of this university in recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science: PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.

(7) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools, departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises above-mentioned.

(8) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.

(9) To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the governor and to the legislature in providing for the institution.

(10) To offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities in accordance with RCW 28B.77.080.

(11) To confer honorary degrees upon persons who request an honorary degree if they were students at the university in 1942 and did not graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp. The honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of deceased persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066, signed February 19, 1942.

[ 2012 c 229 s 804; 2010 c 51 s 1; 2004 c 275 s 52; 1998 c 245 s 16; 1985 c 370 s 92; 1977 c 75 s 20; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.130. Prior: 1939 c 176 s 1, part; 1927 c 227 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 240 s 5, part; RRS s 4557, part; prior: 1895 c 101 s 2, part; 1893 c 122 s 10, part; 1890 pp 396, 397, 398 ss 7, 9, 11. Formerly RCW 28.77.130, 28.77.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.